Rhode Island, session 2025, SB698.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-17.30-2, 23-17.30-4 and 23-17.30-5 of the General Laws in
Chapter 23-17.30 entitled "Primary Care Training Sites Program" are hereby amended to read as
follows:
23-17.30-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases are construed as follows:
(1) “Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care” or “AAAHC” means an
organization that provides ambulatory health care accreditation.
(1)(2) “Director” means the director of the department of health.
(2)(3) “Grant” means a sum awarded pursuant to a contract executed pursuant to § 23-
17.30-4.
(3)(4) “National Committee for Quality Assurance” or “NCQA” means the nonprofit
organization headquartered in the District of Columbia working to improve healthcare quality
through the administration of evidence-based standards, measures, programs, and accreditation.
(4)(5) “Office” means the office of primary care training established pursuant to the
provisions of § 23-17.30-3.
(6) “Office of health insurance commissioner” or “OHIC” means the state agency with the
authority to designate patient-centered medical home (PCMH), in accordance with agencies
regulations.
(5)(7) “Patient-centered medical home” or “PCMH” means a model of health care that puts

patients at the forefront of care by providing team-based healthcare delivery led by a healthcare
provider to render comprehensive and continuous medical care to patients with a goal to obtain
maximal health outcomes.
(6)(8) “Primary care” means day-to-day health care provided by a healthcare professional.
Typically, the healthcare professional acts as the first contact and principal point of continuing care
for patients within a healthcare system, and coordinates other specialist care that the patient may
require.
(7)(9) “Primary care site” means a site, location, or medical practice that serves as the
patient’s entry point into the healthcare system and acts as the continuing focal point for all required
healthcare services.
23-17.30-4. Contracts.
In compliance with the provisions of § 42-11-11, the director shall have the authority to
enter into contracts, subject to appropriation, for medical education to be conducted at primary care
practice sites. Any contract entered into shall not exceed ninety thousand dollars ($90,000) per
primary care site contract recipient, per calendar year and shall contain, at a minimum, the
following terms, conditions, and provisions:
(1) The primary care site shall serve as an enhanced interdisciplinary clinical training site;
(2) The primary care site shall have achieved and shall maintain NCQA PCMH distinction;,
or have achieved and maintained NCQA case management accreditation, or be recognized as a
PCMH by the office of the health insurance commissioner, or other appropriate entity, such as the
joint commission on AAAHC, as determined by the department of health.
(3) The primary care site shall provide integrated behavioral health services;
(4) The primary care site shall provide an agreed curriculum of training for physicians,
nurse practitioners, and physician assistants; and
(5) Training shall include a minimum of up to five (5) hours didactic training and shall
introduce the trainees to the concept of PCMH and how the principles of the model have been
operationalized in the primary care delivery setting.
23-17.30-5. Rules and regulations.
The director shall may promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of
this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001788
========
LC001788 - Page 2 of 3